Washington statutes.
RCW 36.13.070

County census authorized—Penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of RCW 36.13.020, 36.13.030, 36.13.040, and 36.13.050, or any officer or enumerator making, assisting, or permitting any duplication of names or making, permitting, or assisting in the enumeration of any fictitious names or persons in taking the census, shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.13.070. Prior: 1923 c 177 s 6; RRS s 4200-11.]